Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.210

Duty of officers collecting moneys.

Every officer collecting or receiving any money belonging to a town shall settle for it with the clerk on the first Monday of each month and immediately pay it into the treasury on the order of the clerk to be credited to the fund to which it belongs.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.210. Prior: 1890 p 214 s 175; RRS s 9193.]